Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1593.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Operator” means a person that:
(A) Offers a person the opportunity to participate in a sport, fitness or recreational ac-
tivity; or
(B) Operates or provides a facility or place where a person can participate in a sport,
fitness or recreational activity.
(b) “Sport, fitness or recreational activity” means an indoor or outdoor activity involving
elements of inherent risk, including but not limited to hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
rafting, biking, camping, skiing, snowboarding, winter sports, team and individual sports,
climbing, equestrian and rodeo activities, hiking, outfitter guiding, environmental restoration
and maintenance, ocean and water sports, motorized recreation, athletic or fitness competi-
tions and fitness and training activities.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an operator may require a person
who is 18 years of age or older, or a parent or guardian on behalf of a person who is under
18 years of age, to release the operator from any claim for ordinary negligence that arises
out of or results from the person’s participation in a sport, fitness or recreational activity,
rental of equipment for a sport, fitness or recreational activity, use of a facility or place for
a sport, fitness or recreational activity or volunteering to maintain facilities or places used
for sport, fitness or recreational activities, before the person participates in the sport, fit-
ness or recreational activity, rents equipment, uses a facility or place or volunteers. A re-
lease described in this subsection is not unconscionable or void as contrary to public policy.
(3) An operator may not require a person to release the operator from any claim for a
willful or wanton act or omission, a reckless act or omission or a grossly negligent act or
omission. A release described in this subsection is severable from a release for ordinary
negligence required by the operator.
(4) A release that is broader than the release described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall be construed within the limits stated in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, section 1 of this 2026
Act applies to releases executed before, on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2)(a) Section 1 of this 2026 Act does not apply to the release of any claim for which a
final judgment has been entered before the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(b) As used in this subsection, “final judgment” means a judgment for which the time to
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1593
appeal has expired without any party filing an appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]